Washington statutes.
RCW 33.48.090

Dividends only if interest paid on deposits.

No dividend shall be paid or credited upon shares of stock for any period in which the association has not declared and paid interest on deposits eligible to receive interest.

[ 1982 c 3 s 95; 1955 c 122 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.